Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202577-2615.01
Licensees; disciplinary action; procedure; appeal; joint and several liability; when.

(1) In addition to sections 77-2615 and 77-2622, for any violation of sections 77-2601 to 77-2623 or the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under such sections, the Tax Commissioner may:

(a) After notice and hearing, suspend or revoke the licenses of any person licensed under sections 28-1420 to 28-1429 or 77-2601 to 77-2623. Notice of hearing shall be given as provided in the Administrative Procedure Act; and

(b) Impose an administrative penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars for any violation.

(2) No person whose license has been suspended or revoked shall sell cigarettes or permit cigarettes to be sold during the period of suspension or revocation on the premises occupied by him or her. No disciplinary proceeding or action shall be barred or abated by the expiration, transfer, surrender, continuance, renewal, or extension of any license issued under sections 28-1420 to 28-1429 or 77-2601 to 77-2623.

(3) Any person aggrieved by any decision, order, or finding of the Tax Commissioner may appeal the decision, order, or finding, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

(4) If a person's license has been suspended or revoked and the person's name has been removed for at least ten days from the list of licensed entities published by the Tax Commissioner under subsection (4) of section 77-2603, any person that sells cigarettes to or purchases cigarettes from such person shall be jointly and severally liable for any taxes applicable to such cigarettes under section 77-2602 and for any escrow due on such cigarettes under section 69-2703.

Laws 2002, LB 989, § 15;

Laws 2011, LB590, § 36;

Laws 2025, LB9, § 9.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.